Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 64 Residence of Children for School Purposes

16-64-1.
Residency of children for school purposes.

Except as provided by law or by agreement, a child shall be enrolled in the school system of the city or town where he or she resides. A child shall be deemed to be a resident of the city or town where his or her parents reside. If the child’s parents reside in different cities or towns the child shall be deemed to be a resident of the city or town in which the parent having actual custody of the child resides. In cases where a child has no living parents, has been abandoned by his or her parents, or when parents are unable to care for their child on account of parental illness or family break-up, the child shall be deemed to be a resident of the city or town where the child lives with his or her legal guardian, natural guardian, or other person acting in loco parentis to the child. An emancipated minor shall be deemed to be a resident of the city or town where he or she lives. Children placed in group homes, in foster care, in child caring facilities, or by a Rhode Island state agency or a Rhode Island licensed child placing agency shall be deemed to be residents of the city or town where the group home, child caring facility, or foster home is located for the purposes of enrollment, and this city or town shall be reimbursed or the child’s education shall be paid for in accordance with §

16-64-1.1

. In all other cases a child’s residence shall be determined in accordance with the applicable rules of the common law. Where a child is a resident in a dwelling which lies in more than one municipality, the parent(s) or guardian shall choose which school district the child shall attend without payment of costs as tuition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 169, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 68, § 2.

16-64-1.1.
Payment and reimbursement for educational costs of children placed in foster care, group homes, or other residential facility by a Rhode Island state agency.

Children placed in foster care by a Rhode Island-licensed child-placing agency or a Rhode Island governmental agency shall be entitled to the same free, appropriate public education provided to all other residents of the city or town where the child is placed. The city or town shall pay the cost of the education of the child during the time the child is in foster care in the city or town.

Children placed by the department of children, youth and families (DCYF) in a group home or other residential facility that does not include the delivery of educational services are to be educated by the community in which the group home or other residential facility is located, and those children shall be entitled to the same free, appropriate public education provided to all other residents of the city or town where the child is placed. For purposes of payment and reimbursement for educational costs under this chapter, the term “group home or other residential facility” shall not include independent-living programs. Each city and town that contains one or more group homes or other residential facilities that do not include delivery of educational services will receive funds as part of state aid to education in accordance with the following provisions:

On December 31 of each year, the DCYF shall provide the department of elementary and secondary education with a precise count of how many group home or other residential facility “beds” exist in each Rhode Island city or town, counting only those “beds” in facilities that do not include the delivery of educational services. The number of “beds” in each group home or other residential facility shall be equal to the maximum number of children who may be placed in that group home or other residential facility on any given night according to the applicable licensure standards of the DCYF.

For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, if the number of beds certified by DCYF for a school district by December 31, 2007, is greater than the number certified March 14, 2007, upon which the education aid for FY 2008 was appropriated, the education aid for that district will be increased by the number of increased beds multiplied by fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000). Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any law to the contrary, the education aid for all group home or other residential facility “beds” located or associated with the Children’s Residential and Family Treatment (CRAFT) program located on the East Providence campus of Bradley Hospital shall be twenty-two thousand dollars ($22,000) per bed. The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education shall include the additional aid in equal payments in March, April, May, and June, and the Governor’s budget recommendations pursuant to §

35-3-8

shall include the amounts required to provide the increased aid.

For all fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2016, education aid for each school district shall include seventeen thousand dollars ($17,000) for each bed certified by DCYF by the preceding December 31. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any law to the contrary, the education aid for all group home or other residential facility “beds” located or associated with the Children’s Residential and Family Treatment (CRAFT) program located on the East Providence campus of Bradley Hospital shall be twenty-six thousand dollars ($26,000) per bed. For all fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2008, whenever the number of beds certified by DCYF for a school district by December 31 is greater than the number certified the prior December 31 upon which the education aid for that fiscal year was appropriated, the education aid for that district as enacted by the assembly during the prior legislative session for that fiscal year will be increased by the number of increased beds multiplied by the amount per bed authorized for that fiscal year. The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education shall include the additional aid in equal payments in March, April, May, and June, and the Governor’s budget recommendations pursuant to §

35-3-8

shall include the amounts required to provide the increased aid.

Children placed by DCYF in a residential-treatment program, group home, or other residential facility, whether or not located in the state of Rhode Island, which includes the delivery of educational services provided by that facility (excluding facilities where students are taught on grounds for periods of time by teaching staff provided by the school district in which the facility is located), shall have the cost of their education paid for as provided for in subsection (d) and §

16-64-1.2

. The city or town determined to be responsible to DYCF for a per-pupil special-education cost pursuant to §

16-64-1.2

shall pay its share of the cost of educational services to DCYF or to the facility providing educational services.

Children placed by DCYF in group homes, child-caring facilities, community residences, or other residential facilities shall have the entire cost of their education paid for by DCYF if:

The facility is operated by the state of Rhode Island or the facility has a contract with DCYF to fund a pre-determined number of placements or part of the facility’s program;

The facility is state licensed; and

The facility operates an approved, on-grounds educational program, whether or not the child attends the on-grounds program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 68, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 22, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 19, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 21, § 6; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 68; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 11, § 6.

16-64-1.2.
Designation of residency of children in state care for purposes of financial responsibility under § 16-64-1.1(c) — Effect of designation of residence.

An initial factual determination and designation of the residence of the parent(s) of a child placed in the care and custody of the state shall be made by the family court in accordance with §

33-15.1-2

. The director of the department of children, youth, and families shall incorporate any designation of parent’s residence on the child’s intra-state education identification card and update the designation pursuant to §

42-72.4-1(b)

.

If no factual determination and designation of the residence of the parent(s) of a child placed in the care and custody of the state is made by the family court pursuant to §

16-64-1.2(a)

, then the department of elementary and secondary education shall designate the city or town to be responsible for the per-pupil special education cost of education to be paid to DCYF or to the facility providing educational services for children in state care pursuant to §

16-64-1.1(c)

.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall designate the city or town to be responsible for the per-pupil special education cost of education to be paid to DCYF for children in state care who have neither a father, mother, nor guardian living in the state or whose residence can be determined in the state or who have been surrendered for adoption or who have been freed for adoption by a court of competent jurisdiction using the following criteria: (1) last known Rhode Island residence of the child’s father, mother, or guardian prior to moving from the state, dying, surrendering the child for adoption or having parental rights terminated; (2) when the child’s parents are separated or divorced and neither parent resides in the state, the last known residence of the last parent known to have lived in the state. This designation by the department of elementary and secondary education shall be incorporated on the child’s intra-state education identification card.

The designation of a city or town pursuant to subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section shall constitute prima facie evidence of parents’ residence in the city or town and/or the city or town’s financial responsibility for the child’s education as provided in §

16-64-1.1

. Pending any final decision under §

16-64-6

that a different city, town or agency bears any financial responsibility, the commissioner shall be authorized to order the general treasurer to deduct the amount owed from the designated community’s school aid and to pay this amount to DCYF.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 68, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 22, § 3.

16-64-1.3.
Educational responsibility for children in group homes and other residential placements.

The city or town in which a foster home, group home, or other residential facility that does not include the delivery of educational services is located shall be responsible for the free appropriate public education of any child residing in those placements, including all procedural safeguards, evaluation, and instruction in accordance with regulations under chapter 24 of this title, for any period during which a child is residing in the city or town. The city or town shall coordinate its efforts with any other city or town to which a child moves when exiting the city or town responsible under this subsection.

The city or town responsible for payment under §

16-64-1.1(c)

for payment of a city or town’s per pupil special education cost to DCYF for a child placed in a residential facility, group home, or other residential facility that includes the delivery of educational services shall be responsible for the free, appropriate public education, including all procedural safeguards, evaluation and instruction in accordance with regulations under chapter 24 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 68, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 22, § 3.

16-64-2.
Retention of residence.

A child shall be eligible to receive education from the city or town in which the child’s residence has been established until his or her residence has been established in another city or town and that city or town has enrolled the child within its school system, unless the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, pursuant to §

16-64-6

, has ordered otherwise. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit a city or town in its own discretion from enrolling a child within its school system before a child has established technical residency within the city or town. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate any rules that may be needed to implement the educational provisions of the Stewart B. McKinney Homeless Assistance Act (P.L. 105-220), 42 U.S.C. § 11431 et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 22, § 3.

16-64-3.
Burden of proof.

In any proceeding where it is alleged that a child’s residence has been changed due to illness of a parent, the break-up of the child’s family, abandonment of the child by his or her parents, death of the child’s parents, or emancipation of the child, the party alleging the existence of these circumstances shall have the burden of proof and shall make proof by a preponderance of the evidence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 367, § 1.

16-64-4.
Effect of guardianship.

The appointment of a guardian of the person of a child pursuant to chapter 15.1 of title 33 shall not operate to change a child’s residence unless the child takes up residence with the guardian and unless the guardian has been appointed for a substantial reason other than to change the child’s residence for the purpose of enrolling the child in another school system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 367, § 1.

16-64-5.
Children under care and control of state agency.

In cases where the director of a Rhode Island state agency considers it likely that a child under his or her care and control will be subject to a short term placement or series of short term placements, the director may petition the commissioner of elementary and secondary education to designate the child’s original city or town of residence as having continuing responsibility for the child’s education. This designation shall be effective for period not greater than two (2) months unless an extension is granted by the commissioner. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit any school system from providing transportation for the child without charge. Disputes under this section including disputes relating to transportation shall be resolved in accordance with §

16-64-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 367, § 1.

16-64-6.
Disputes over residency — Determination proceedings.

When a school district or a state agency charged with educating children denies that it is responsible for educating a child on the grounds that the child is not a resident of the school district or that the child is not the educational responsibility of the state agency, the dispute shall, on the motion of any party to the dispute, be resolved by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or the commissioner’s designee who shall hold a hearing and determine the issue. At any hearing, all parties in interest shall have the right to a notice of the hearing and an opportunity to present evidence and argument on their own behalf. A hearing under §

16-39-2

shall not be a prerequisite to a hearing under this section. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall have power to issue any interim orders pending a hearing needed to insure that a child receives education during the pendency of any matter. Interim orders and all final orders shall be enforceable in the superior court for Providence County at the request of any interested party and shall be subject to review in the superior court in accordance with the Rhode Island Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 367, § 1.

16-64-7.
Pupil records — Transfer and access.

When the family court enters an order pursuant to the provisions of §

33-15.1-2

vesting the right to control a child’s education with the department of children, youth, and families, that department shall be empowered to authorize and direct the transfer of public school pupil records pertaining to the child when the child is moved to a new city or town through action of the department of children, youth, and families.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 71, § 1.

16-64-8.
Completion of semester of school year.

When a student changes his or her residence during the course of a semester the student shall be allowed to complete the semester in his or her original city or town of residence. If the student is a senior or about to enter his or her senior year the student shall be allowed to complete his or her senior year in his or her original city or town of residence. No school district shall be required to provide transportation to a student exercising the option permitted by this section. No school district shall require a student to exercise the option allowed in this section. No school district shall be required to pay tuition for a student who exercises the option allowed in this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the rights of any person covered by the McKinney Homeless Assistance Act (P.L. 105-220), 42 U.S.C. § 11431 et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 22, § 3.

16-64-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 159, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 22, § 4, effective July 1, 2001. For present similar provisions, see §

16-64-1.1

.